Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20142-10,105
Optional inspections; nursery stock distributor's license; optional
issuance.

(1) Optional inspections of plants may be conducted
by the department upon request by any persons desiring such inspection. A
fee as set forth in subsection
(2) of section 2-1095 shall be charged for
such an inspection.

(2) Any person who desires a nursery stock distributor's license
for any greenhouse plants grown for indoor use, annual plants, florist stock,
cut flowers, sod, turf, onions, or potatoes, or seeds of any such plant, may
apply for such license to the department. The inspection of such plants shall
conform to the same requirements that apply to the inspection of nursery stock
as set forth in section
2-1095. For persons who grow or distribute both nursery stock
and greenhouse plants grown for indoor use, annual plants, florist stock, cut flowers,
sod, turf, onions, or potatoes, or seeds of any such plant, one license shall
be issued if the annual inspection of such plants is conducted concurrently
with the nursery stock inspection and the other requirements of the Plant
Protection and Plant Pest Act are met. If a reinspection trip is required,
the applicant shall be assessed a reinspection fee as outlined in subsection (2) of section 2-1095.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 34;

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 27;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 18.